Washington statutes.
RCW 19.220.020

Jurisdiction.

For purposes of establishing personal jurisdiction under chapter 115, Laws of 2002, an international matchmaking organization is deemed to be doing business in Washington and therefore subject to specific jurisdiction if it contracts for matchmaking services with a Washington resident or if it is considered to be doing business under any other provision or rule of law.

[ 2002 c 115 s 3.]